Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.265

Broker's fee and closing expenses—Sale, mortgage or lease.

In connection with the sale, mortgage or lease of property, the court may authorize the personal representative to pay, out of the proceeds realized therefrom or out of the estate, the customary and reasonable auctioneer's and broker's fees and any necessary expenses for abstracting, title insurance, survey, revenue stamps and other necessary costs and expenses in connection therewith.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.56.265.]

NOTES:

Allowance of necessary expenses to personal representative: RCW 11.48.050.